dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="oznamovate/ľ__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľa</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľovi</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľu</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľa</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľ</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>li</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľ</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľom</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľ</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľov</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľom</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľov</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľoch</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lia</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľmi</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lia</l>
        <r>ľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Egypt__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="opoz/itum__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itu</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itum</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ite</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itum</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itom</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itum</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ít</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itám</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itá</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itách</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itá</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itami</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itá</l>
        <r>itum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="roháč__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Tur/iec__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cu</l>
        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iec</l>
        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iec</l>
        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>com</l>
        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iec</l>
        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="Bardejov"><i>Bardejov</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Berlín"><i>Berlín</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Devín"><i>Devín</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Egypt"><i>Egypt</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Hron"><i>Hron</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Londýn"><i>Londýn</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Prešov"><i>Prešov</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Púchov"><i>Púchov</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Rím"><i>Rím</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Salvádor"><i>Salvádor</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Slovan"><i>Slovan</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tallinn"><i>Tallinn</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Trebišov"><i>Trebišov</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Trenčín"><i>Trenčín</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Turiec"><i>Tur</i><par n="Tur/iec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Vranov"><i>Vranov</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zlín"><i>Zlín</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zvolen"><i>Zvolen</i><par n="Egypt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beluš"><i>beluš</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bundáš"><i>bundáš</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chochláč"><i>chochláč</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daniel"><i>daniel</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deliteľ"><i>delite</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dromedár"><i>dromedár</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gunár"><i>gunár</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hláč"><i>hláč</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="homár"><i>homár</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hranostaj"><i>hranostaj</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ikernáč"><i>ikernáč</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jaguár"><i>jaguár</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jarabáč"><i>jarabáč</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jazvec"><i>jazvec</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jež"><i>jež</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komár"><i>komár</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="menovateľ"><i>menovate</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="menšiteľ"><i>menšite</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mocniteľ"><i>mocnite</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mrož"><i>mrož</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mäkkýš"><i>mäkkýš</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="netopier"><i>netopier</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="násobiteľ"><i>násobite</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obaľovač"><i>obaľovač</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odmocniteľ"><i>odmocnite</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opozitum"><i>opoz</i><par n="opoz/itum__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ostriež"><i>ostriež</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oznamovateľ"><i>oznamovate</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pleskáč"><i>pleskáč</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="préteritum"><i>préter</i><par n="opoz/itum__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pĺž"><i>pĺž</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roháč"><i>roháč</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strakoš"><i>strakoš</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="súčiniteľ"><i>súčinite</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tátoš"><i>tátoš</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ukazovateľ"><i>ukazovate</i><par n="oznamovate/ľ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zavináč"><i>zavináč</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zdochlinár"><i>zdochlinár</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zrniar"><i>zrniar</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čuvač"><i>čuvač</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="číž"><i>číž</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="španiel"><i>španiel</i><par n="roháč__n"/></e>
